pt-PT: Utilização prevista da base de corte: Utilização geral; Trabalhos em pele; Modelação e corte para passatempos; Trabalhos manuais em papel e scrapbooking; Acolchoamento e corte rotativo; Costura e corte de moldes; Despelicular vinil (máquinas de corte artesanais); Outro
cs: Zamýšlené použití řezací podložky: Univerzální; Zpracování kůže; Modelářství a hobby řezání; Práce s papírem a scrapbooking; Patchwork a řezání kolečkem; Šití a střihy; Separace vinylu (vyřezávací plotry); Jiné
ja: カッティングマットの用途: 汎用; レザークラフト; 模型製作・ホビー用; ペーパークラフト・スクラップブッキング; キルティング・ロータリーカッティング; 裁縫・パターンカッティング; カス取り (クラフトカッター); その他
it: Utilizzo previsto del tappetino da taglio: Uso generale; Lavorazione della pelle; Modellismo e hobbistica; Lavori con la carta e scrapbooking; Quilting e taglio con rotella; Cucito e taglio cartamodelli; Spellicolamento vinile (plotter da taglio); Altro
pt-BR: Uso pretendido da base de corte: Uso geral; Trabalho em couro; Modelismo e corte por hobby; Artesanato em papel e scrapbook; Quilting e corte rotativo; Costura e corte de moldes; Depilação de vinil (plotters de recorte); Outros
tr: Kesme matının kullanım amacı: Genel amaçlı; Deri işleme; Model yapımı ve hobi kesimi; Kağıt el sanatları ve albüm yapımı; Kapitone ve döner bıçakla kesim; Dikiş ve kalıp kesimi; Vinil ayıklama (el işi kesiciler); Diğer
da: Skæremåttens anvendelsesformål: Allround; Læderarbejde; Modelfremstilling og hobbyskæring; Papirhobby og scrapbooking; Quiltning og rulleskæring; Syning og mønsterskæring; Vinylrensning (hobbyskæremaskiner); Andet
ko: 커팅 매트의 용도: 다목적; 가죽 공예; 모형 제작 및 취미용 커팅; 종이 공예 및 스크랩북; 퀼팅 및 로터리 커팅; 재봉 및 패턴 커팅; 비닐 위딩(공예용 커터); 기타
fr: Usage prévu du tapis de découpe: Usage général; Travail du cuir; Modélisme et loisirs créatifs; Créations en papier et scrapbooking; Matelassage et découpe rotative; Couture et découpe de patrons; Échenillage de vinyle (machines de découpe); Autre
vi: Mục đích sử dụng thảm cắt: Đa dụng; Làm đồ da; Làm mô hình và cắt thủ công; Thủ công bằng giấy và sổ lưu niệm; Chần bông và cắt bằng dao xoay; May vá và cắt rập; Tách chi tiết decal (máy cắt thủ công); Khác
en: Cutting mat intended use: General purpose; Leatherworking; Model making and hobby cutting; Paper crafts and scrapbooking; Quilting and rotary cutting; Sewing and pattern cutting; Vinyl weeding (craft cutters); Other
pl: Zamierzone zastosowanie maty do cięcia: Ogólnego przeznaczenia; Kaletnictwo; Modelarstwo i wycinanie hobbystyczne; Rękodzieło z papieru i scrapbooking; Pikowanie i cięcie nożem krążkowym; Szycie i wycinanie wykrojów; Obieranie folii winylowej (plotery tnące); Inne
sv: Avsedd användning av skärmattan: Allmänt bruk; Läderarbete; Modellbygge och hobbyskärning; Papperspyssel och scrapbooking; Quiltning och rullskärning; Sömnad och mönsterskärning; Rensning av vinyl (skärmaskiner); Annat
lt-LT: Pjovimo kilimėlio paskirtis: Bendroji paskirtis; Darbas su oda; Modeliavimas ir pomėgiai; Dirbiniai iš popieriaus ir iškarpų albumai; Daigstymas ir pjaustymas diskiniu peiliu; Siuvimas ir iškarpų pjaustymas; Vinilo lupimas (pjaustyklėms); Kita
sl-SI: Namen uporabe rezalne podloge: Splošen namen; Obdelava usnja; Modelarstvo in hobi izrezovanje; Ustvarjanje s papirjem in spominske knjige; Izdelava krpank in krožno rezanje; Šivanje in izrezovanje krojev; Odstranjevanje vinila (obrtniški rezalniki); Drugo
bg-BG: Предназначение на подложката за рязане: Общо предназначение; Обработка на кожа; Изработка на модели и хоби рязане; Хартиени занаяти и скрапбукинг; Куилтинг и ротационно рязане; Шиене и изрязване на кройки; Почистване на винил (крафт плотери); Други
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση του υποστρώματος κοπής: Γενικής χρήσης; Δερματοτεχνία; Μοντελισμός και κοπές χόμπι; Χειροτεχνίες με χαρτί και scrapbooking; Καπιτονέ και περιστροφική κοπή; Ραπτική και κοπή πατρόν; Αποφλοίωση βινυλίου (κοπτικά χειροτεχνίας); Άλλο
th: แผ่นรองตัดมีวัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานอย่างไร: อเนกประสงค์; งานเครื่องหนัง; การทำโมเดลและงานอดิเรก; งานประดิษฐ์กระดาษและสแครปบุ๊ก; งานควิลท์และงานตัดด้วยใบมีดหมุน; งานเย็บผ้าและตัดแพทเทิร์น; งานลอกลายไวนิล (เครื่องตัดงานคราฟท์); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 切割墊預期用途: 通用; 皮革加工; 模型製作和嗜好裁切; 紙藝和剪貼簿; 拼布和輪刀裁切; 縫紉和打版裁切; 乙烯基挑字 (手工藝切割機); 其他
ru: Предназначение коврика для раскроя: Общего назначения; Работа с кожей; Моделирование и хобби; Бумажные поделки и скрапбукинг; Квилтинг и роликовая резка; Шитье и раскройка; Выборка винила (плоттерная резка); Другое
nb: Tiltenkt bruk av skjærematte: Generelt bruk; Lærarbeid; Modellbygging og hobby; Papirhobby og skrapbok; Quilting og rulleskjæring; Søm og mønsterskjæring; Pelling av vinyl (hobbymaskiner); Annet
es: Uso previsto de la esterilla de corte: Uso general; Trabajo en cuero; Modelismo y manualidades; Manualidades en papel y álbumes de recortes; Acolchado y corte rotativo; Costura y corte de patrones; Depilado de vinilo (cortadores para manualidades); Otro
zh-CN: 切割垫的预期用途: 通用; 皮革加工; 模型制作和爱好裁切; 纸艺和剪贴簿; 绗缝和轮刀裁切; 缝纫和打版裁切; 乙烯基除废（手工刻字机）; 其他
ro-RO: Utilizarea preconizată a caroiajului de tăiere: De uz general; Prelucrarea pielii; Modelaj și tăiere pentru hobby-uri; Artizanat din hârtie și scrapbooking; Quilting și tăiere rotativă; Croit și tăiat tipare; Decupare vinil (plottere de tăiere); Altele
fi: Leikkausmaton käyttötarkoitus: Yleiskäyttö; Nahkatyöt; Pienoismallien rakennus ja harrasteleikkaus; Paperiaskartelu ja leikekirjat; Tilkkutyöt ja pyöröleikkaus; Ompelu ja kaavojen leikkaus; Vinyylin perkaus (askarteluleikkurit); Muu
nl: Snijmat beoogd gebruik: Algemeen gebruik; Lederbewerking; Modelbouw en hobbysnijden; Papierknutselen en scrapbooking; Quilten en rolsnijden; Naaien en patroonsnijden; Vinyl pellen (hobbysnijders); Overig
hr-HR: Namjena podloge za rezanje: Opća namjena; Obrada kože; Izrada modela i hobi izrezivanje; Rukotvorine od papira i scrapbooking; Prošivanje i kružno izrezivanje; Šivanje i izrezivanje krojeva; Čišćenje vinila (hobi rezači); Ostalo
de: Verwendungszweck der Schneidematte: Mehrzweck; Lederverarbeitung; Modellbau und Hobby-Zuschnitt; Papierbasteln und Scrapbooking; Quilten und Rollschneiden; Nähen und Schnittmuster; Vinyl-Entgittern (Hobby-Schneideplotter); Sonstige
hu: Vágóalátét rendeltetésszerű használata: Általános célú; Bőrdíszművesség; Modellezés és hobbivágás; Papírkézművesség és scrapbook; Foltvarrás és körkéses vágás; Varrás és szabásminta-kivágás; Fóliaszedés (hobbi vágógépek); Egyéb
sk-SK: Určenie použitia rezacej podložky: Na všeobecné použitie; Spracovanie kože; Modelárstvo a hobby rezanie; Tvorba z papiera a scrapbooking; Prešívanie a rotačné rezanie; Šitie a strihanie vzorov; Odstraňovanie vinylu (hobby rezačky); Iné